Hawaii statutes.
§346-59.2 Comprehensive breast and
cervical cancer control program. (a) There is established the
comprehensive breast and cervical cancer control program, to be administered by
the department of human services in collaboration with the department of health,
to assist women who have been diagnosed with breast or cervical cancer by the
Hawaii comprehensive breast and cervical cancer control program, but who are
not eligible for federally-funded medicaid coverage as provided by the Breast
and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000.

(b) Under the comprehensive breast and
cervical cancer control program, the department of human services shall provide
state-funded medical assistance, as appropriated by the legislature, to women
who are diagnosed with breast or cervical cancer through the Hawaii
comprehensive breast and cervical cancer control program, but who are not
eligible for federal medicaid coverage; provided that the person either:

(1) Is a resident alien of Hawaii who is not eligible
for medicaid; or

(2) Would be eligible under medicaid except that the
person has health care coverage that specifically does not provide coverage for
cancer treatment.

(c) The department of health shall work
collaboratively with the department of human services to assist in and support
the screening, education, and outreach process regardless of a woman's
eligibility for medicaid coverage.

(d) Under the comprehensive breast and
cervical cancer control program, the department of health shall provide state-funded
medical assistance, as funded by the legislature, to:

(1) Screen women for breast and cervical cancer;

(2) Educate women regarding the risks associated with
breast and cervical cancer; and

(3) Provide outreach to women who are at risk for
breast and cervical cancer.

[(e)] The department of health and the
department of human services shall submit an annual report to the legislature
no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session on the
expenditure of all funds for the comprehensive breast and cervical cancer
control program. [L 2001, c 278, §2; am L 2008, c 52, §§2, 4]

Revision Note

Subsection (e) was codified to this section pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next